Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1245
Motorboat; proper ventilation of bilges required.

Every motorboat and every vessel, except open boats, using as fuel any liquid of a volatile nature, shall be provided with such means as may be prescribed by the regulations of the commission for properly and efficiently ventilating the bilges of the engine and fuel tank compartments so as to remove any explosive or inflammable gases.

Laws 1978, LB 21, § 45.